Hawaii statutes.
§183D-62 Taking, injuring, or destroying
wild birds prohibited. Except as provided in section 183D-61, no person
shall intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly take, catch, injure, kill, or
destroy, or attempt to take, catch, injure, kill, or destroy, any wild bird, or
to keep or have possession of any wild bird, dead or alive, or to damage or
destroy a nest of any wild bird. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next